Hawaii statutes.
§431:4-414 Subscribers. Any person may
make application for, enter into agreement for and hold policies or contracts
in or with, and be a subscriber of a domestic, foreign or alien reciprocal
insurer. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next